Louisiana, session 2026, HB730.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 2:135.1(A)(2) and (P) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
2:135.1(Q) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§135.1. Authority to equip, improve, establish fees and charges, and lease airport
facilities
A. Airport districts, airport authorities, and other political subdivisions,
including the New Orleans Aviation Board, which establish or operate airports or
landing fields or which acquire or set apart immovable property for such purpose
may:
* * *
(2) Adopt regulations and establish charges, fees, and tolls for the use of
such airports or landing fields, fix penalties for the violation of regulations, and
establish privileges to enforce payment of the charges, fees, and tolls, except that
such authority will not be used to discriminate against the use of such airports or
landing fields by any legitimate aviation interest and except as otherwise provided
in Subsection P of this Section.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 730 ENROLLED
P.(1) No person or entity may use information broadcast or collected by
automatic dependent surveillance-broadcast systems as a means for calculating,
generating, and collecting fees or taxes from aircraft owners or operators who
operate aircraft within the geographic boundaries of the state.
(2) For the purposes of this Subsection, the following definitions shall
apply:
(a) "Aircraft" has the same meaning as provided in R.S. 2:1, except the
aircraft shall have a maximum certificated takeoff weight of twelve thousand four
hundred ninety-nine pounds or less and operate pursuant to 14 CFR 91 and 14 CFR
141.
(b) "Automatic dependent surveillance-broadcast" means an advanced
aviation surveillance technology that combines an aircraft's position with a ground
infrastructure to create an accurate surveillance interface between an aircraft and air
traffic control. The term consists of two different services, ADS-B In and ADS-B
Out, that can provide information, such as an aircraft's global positioning system
location, altitude, ground speed, and other data, to ground stations and other aircraft,
as well as weather and traffic information to aircraft operators.
(3) Any person or entity that violates Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall
be fined by the department not more than five hundred dollars for each occurrence.
P. Q. The provisions of this Section shall have no effect on the provisions
of R.S. 33:130.351 through 130.359.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.